Massachusetts, session 194th, H5565.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 31 or 32 of the General Laws or
any other general or special law to the contrary, the retirement board of the City of Lawrence is
hereby authorized and directed to credit Abel Cano, Jr. with creditable service for working for
the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, as a full time civil service police officer, during
the period of February, nineteen hundred and ninety-seven through February, nineteen hundred
and ninety-nine, up to two years of service inclusive for the purpose of determining his
superannuation retirement allowance; provided, however, that before the date the retirement
allowance becomes effective, Abel Cano, Jr. shall pay an amount equal to that which would have
been withheld as regular deductions from his regular compensation for such previous service,
plus regular interest. Payments shall be made into the annuity savings fund of the City of
of 2

Lawrence retirement system, in one sum or installments, upon such terms and conditions as the
retirement board may prescribe.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2